Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5568.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. (1) The interest of money shall be is at the rate of $5.00 upon $100.00 for a year, and at the same rate for a greater or less sum, and for a longer or shorter time, except that in all cases it shall be is lawful for the parties to stipulate in writing for the payment of any rate of interest, not exceeding 7% per annum. (2) This act shall does not apply to the any of the following: (a) The rate of interest on any note, bond, or other evidence of indebtedness issued by any corporation, association, or person, the issue and rate of interest of which have been expressly authorized by the public service commission or the securities bureau of the department of commerce, insurance and financial services, or is are regulated by any other law of this state , or of the United States. , nor shall it apply to any (b) Any time price differential which that may be charged upon sales of goods or services on credit. This act shall not be construed to repeal section 78 of Act No. 327 of the Public Acts of 1931, as amended, being section 450.78 of the Compiled Laws of 1948. (c) Any business transacted pursuant to a license under the earned wage access services act. (3) This act shall does not render unlawful , the purchase of any note, bond, or other evidence of indebtedness theretofore issued by any borrower not then domiciled in this state, which bear any rate of interest which that is lawful under the law of the domicile of the borrower at the date of issue thereof, and in such case any such rate of interest may be charged and received by any person, firm, corporation, or association in this state. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5558 (request no. H04676'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.